Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.240

Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than five hundred dollars.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.40.240. Prior: 1923 c 164 s 10; RRS s 3997-10.]